Maryland, session 2025, SB0337.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Election Law
2–208.
(A) EACH LOCAL BOARD SHALL MAKE PUBLICLY AVAILABLE ON ITS
WEBSITE EACH OPEN MEETING AGENDA, TOGETHER WITH A SUMMARY OF ANY
FINALIZED DOCUMENTS, WRITTEN TESTIMONY FROM THE PUBLIC, AND OTHER
MATERIALS THAT THE LOCAL BOARD WILL VOTE ON AT THE OPEN MEETING:
(1) AT LEAST 48 HOURS IN ADVANCE OF EACH MEETING; OR
(2) IF THE MEETING IS BEING HELD DUE TO AN EMERGENCY, A
NATURAL DISASTER, OR ANY OTHER UNANTICIPATED SITUATION, AS FAR IN
ADVANCE OF THE MEETING AS PRACTICABLE.
– 1 –

Ch. 304 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(B) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
EACH LOCAL BOARD SHALL PROVIDE LIVE VIDEO STREAMING OF EACH OPEN
MEETING HELD BY THE LOCAL BOARD.
(2) THE LIVE STREAMING VIDEO REQUIREMENT UNDER PARAGRAPH
(1) OF THIS SUBSECTION DOES NOT APPLY WITH RESPECT TO:
(I) AN OPEN MEETING HELD OFF–SITE;
(II) A PROJECT SITE VISIT; OR
(III) AN INSPECTION CONDUCTED BY THE LOCAL BOARD.
(C) EACH LOCAL BOARD SHALL MAINTAIN A COMPLETE AND UNEDITED
ARCHIVED VIDEO RECORDING OF EACH OPEN MEETING FOR WHICH LIVE VIDEO
STREAMING WAS PROVIDED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION FOR A
MINIMUM OF 5 YEARS AFTER THE DATE OF THE MEETING.
11–301.
(a) A board of canvassers shall:
(1) convene at the designated counting center for that county on or before
the day of the election, but not later than 5 p.m. on that day, and be sworn in; and
(2) meet only in public session.
(B) A BOARD OF CANVASSERS AND THE STAFF OF A LOCAL BOARD SHALL:
(1) PROVIDE LIVE VIDEO STREAMING OF THE CANVASS; AND
(2) MAINTAIN A COMPLETE AND UNEDITED ARCHIVED VIDEO
RECORDING OF THE CANVASS FOR A MINIMUM OF 5 YEARS AFTER THE DATE OF THE
COMPLETION OF THE CANVASS.
[(a–1)] (C) (1) Subject to paragraph (3) of this subsection, a board of canvassers
and the staff of a local board may be observed IN PERSON as they complete each part of
the canvass by authorized observers designated under paragraph (2) of this subsection and
any other individuals who wish to be present.
(2) The following individuals or entities have the right to designate a
registered voter as an observer at each counting center:
(i) a candidate;
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 304
(ii) a political party; and
(iii) any other group of voters supporting or opposing a candidate,
principle, or proposition on the ballot.
(3) The State Board may adopt regulations prohibiting IN–PERSON public
observation of a part of the canvass only if prohibiting IN–PERSON public observation is
necessary to ensure:
(i) the integrity or accuracy of the canvass; or
(ii) that the canvass process is not impeded.
(4) The State Board shall ensure that the requirements of this subsection
are implemented uniformly and consistently by each local board.
[(b)] (D) Each board of canvassers shall elect by majority vote a chairman and
secretary from among its members.
[(c)] (E) Each member of the board of canvassers shall take an oath,
administered and recorded by the clerk of the circuit court, to canvass and declare the votes
cast truthfully and to perform other duties required by law.
[(d)] (F) (1) At the first meeting of the board of canvassers for the purpose of
canvassing, a majority of the whole board of canvassers shall be a quorum.
(2) If a quorum is not present, the members present shall adjourn until the
next day.
[(e)] (G) Except as otherwise provided in this article, all decisions shall be
reached by a majority vote of the members present.
[(f)] (H) In Montgomery County and Prince George’s County, if a member is not
present at the scheduled time for vote canvassing, a substitute member of the board of
canvassers may be sworn in.
[(g)] (I) At least one member of the board of canvassers present shall be a
registered voter of the principal minority party.
[(h)] (J) Once the board has satisfied the requirements of subsections (a)
through [(g)] (I) of this section, it may proceed with the canvass in accordance with the
regulations of the State Board.
11–302.
– 3 –

Ch. 304 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(a) (1) Each local board shall:
(I) meet at its designated counting center to canvass the absentee
ballots cast in that election in accordance with the regulations and guidelines established
by the State Board; AND
(II) COMPLY WITH THE LIVE VIDEO STREAMING AND ARCHIVAL
REQUIREMENTS OF § 11–301(B) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) Promptly after receipt of an absentee ballot, a local board shall review
the ballot envelope or ballot/return envelope for the omission of the voter’s signature on the
oath.
(3) A local board shall record the receipt of an absentee ballot in the
statewide voter registration system and make the information available through the free
access system established under COMAR 33.11.06.03 as soon as practicable, but not later
than:
(i) 2 business days after receipt of an absentee ballot provided by
mail; or
(ii) 4 business days after receipt of an absentee ballot provided
through the Internet or by facsimile transmission.
11–303.
(a) Following an election, each local board shall:
(1) meet at its designated counting center to canvass the provisional ballots
cast in that election in accordance with the regulations and guidelines established by the
State Board; AND
(2) COMPLY WITH THE LIVE VIDEO STREAMING AND ARCHIVAL
REQUIREMENTS OF § 11–301(B) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That on or before December 1,
2025, the State Board of Elections shall adopt regulations to ensure that the live streaming
requirements under §§ 2–208 and 11–301 § 2–208 of the Election Law Article, as enacted
by Section 1 of this Act, are implemented in a manner that:
(1) maximizes transparency of open meetings of local boards and the
canvassing of ballots; and
(2) as applicable, protects the anonymity of voters.
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 304
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 5 –